Georgia, session 2025_26, SB44.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 20-2-165 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to equalization
grants, annual calculations, and allocation, is amended by revising paragraph (9) of
subsection (a) and adding two new subsections to read as follows:
"(9) 'Qualified local school system' is defined as any local school system:
(A) Having an assessed valuation per weighted full-time equivalent count for the year
of the digest which is below the guaranteed valuation;
S. B. 44
- 1 -

LC 49 2224S (SCS)
(B) Having an effective millage rate greater than the millage rate applied to calculate
the local five mill share pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 20-2-164; and
(C) Beginning July 1, 2015, having a millage rate or an equivalent millage of at least
12 mills; beginning July 1, 2016, having a millage rate or an equivalent millage of at
least 12 1/2 mills; beginning July 1, 2017, having a millage rate or an equivalent
millage of at least 13 mills; beginning July 1, 2018, having a millage rate or an
equivalent millage of at least 13 1/2 mills; beginning July 1, 2019, and thereafter,
having a millage rate or an equivalent millage of at least 14 mills July 1, 2025, and
thereafter, having a millage rate or an equivalent millage rate of at least 10 mills."
"(d.1) If, after a local school system's equalization grant has been calculated for the
ensuing fiscal year as provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section, such local school
system decreases the actual or equivalent millage rate levied against its digest for
maintenance and operation to an amount below the minimum amount required in
subparagraph (a)(9)(C) of this Code section, a midterm adjustment in such local school
system's equalization grant shall be made such that the total equalization grant amount
awarded to such local school system is reduced to an amount equal to 75 percent of the
initial equalization grant amount."
"(f) Each year, the Department of Education shall prepare a report of each local school
system that received an equalization grant the previous fiscal year. Such report shall
include for each local school system the initial equalization grant amount, the midterm
adjustment to the equalization grant, and the total amount of equalization grants received
in the previous ten years. Such report shall also identify each local school system that
received an equalization grant during the previous fiscal year while having a millage rate
or an equivalent millage rate of less than 10 mills for the period of time upon which the
calculation of such equalization grant was based. Each year, no later than September 1, the
Department of Education shall provide such report to the chairpersons of the House
Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Appropriations Committee, the House
S. B. 44
- 2 -

LC 49 2224S (SCS)
Committee on Education, the Senate Education and Youth Committee, the director of the
Office of Planning and Budget, the director of the Senate Budget and Evaluation Office,
and the director of the House Budget and Research Office."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 44
- 3 -